Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4854.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1201b. (1) An agent of the insurer shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate an application for insurance unless the agent of the insurer discloses to the insured or prospective insured on a form issued by the director that the agent of the insurer is a representative of the insurer. (2) An agent of the insured shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate an application for insurance unless the agent of the insured discloses to the insured or prospective insured on a form issued by the director that the agent of the insured is a representative of the insured.